Nevada, session 83, AB225.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 640C.100 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
640C.100 1. The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
(a) A person licensed pursuant to chapter 630, 630A, 631, 632,
633, 634, 634A, 634B, 635, 640, 640A or 640B of NRS if the
massage therapy, reflexology or structural integration is performed
in the course of the practice for which the person is licensed.
(b) A person licensed as a barber or apprentice pursuant to
chapter 643 of NRS if the person is massaging, cleansing or
stimulating the scalp, face, neck or skin within the permissible scope
of practice for a barber or apprentice pursuant to that chapter.
(c) A person licensed or registered as an advanced esthetician,
esthetician, esthetician’s apprentice, hair designer, hair designer’s
apprentice, [hair braider, shampoo technologist,] cosmetologist or
cosmetologist’s apprentice pursuant to chapter 644A of NRS if the
person is massaging, cleansing or stimulating the scalp, face, neck
or skin within the permissible scope of practice for an advanced
esthetician, esthetician, esthetician’s apprentice, hair designer, hair
designer’s apprentice, [hair braider, shampoo technologist,]
cosmetologist or cosmetologist’s apprentice pursuant to that chapter.
(d) A person licensed or registered as a nail technologist or nail
technologist’s apprentice pursuant to chapter 644A of NRS if the
person is massaging, cleansing or stimulating the hands, forearms,
feet or lower legs within the permissible scope of practice for a nail
technologist or nail technologist’s apprentice.
(e) A person who is an employee of an athletic department of
any high school, college or university in this State and who, within
the scope of that employment, practices massage therapy,
reflexology or structural integration on athletes.
(f) Students enrolled in a school of massage therapy, reflexology
or structural integration recognized by the Board.
(g) A person who practices massage therapy, reflexology or
structural integration solely on members of his or her immediate
family.
(h) A person who performs any activity in a licensed brothel.
(i) A person who engages in the practice of blow-dry styling,
hair braiding or shampoo technology if the person is massaging,
cleansing or stimulating the scalp, face, neck or skin within the
-
*AB225*

– 5 –
permissible scope of practice of blow-dry styling, hair braiding or
shampoo technology, as applicable.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 and NRS
640C.330, the provisions of this chapter preempt the licensure and
regulation of a massage therapist, reflexologist or structural
integration practitioner by a county, city or town, including, without
limitation, conducting a criminal background investigation and
examination of a massage therapist, reflexologist or structural
integration practitioner or applicant for a license to practice massage
therapy, reflexology or structural integration.
3. The provisions of this chapter do not prohibit a county, city
or town from requiring a massage therapist, reflexologist or
structural integration practitioner to obtain a license or permit to
transact business within the jurisdiction of the county, city or town,
if the license or permit is required of other persons, regardless of
occupation or profession, who transact business within the
jurisdiction of the county, city or town.
4. As used in this section [, “immediate] :
(a) “Blow-dry styling” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 14 of this act.
(b) “Hair braiding” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 644A.085.
(c) “Immediate family” means persons who are related by
blood, adoption or marriage, within the second degree of
consanguinity or affinity.
(d) “Shampoo technology” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 644A.135.
Sec. 2. Chapter 643 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
A licensed barber who supervises an apprentice who
participates in a federally-registered apprenticeship program shall
train the apprentice in all subjects of practical work and related
supplemental instruction for the scope of a license as a barber.
Sec. 3. NRS 643.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
643.010 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires:
1. “Barber school” includes a school of barbering, college of
barbering and any other place or institution of instruction training
persons to engage in the practice of barbering.
2. “Barbershop” means any establishment or place of business
where the practice of barbering is engaged in or carried on.
3. “Blow-dry styling” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 14 of this act.
4. “Board” means the State Barbers’ Health and Sanitation
Board.
-
*AB225*

– 6 –
[4.] 5. “Federally-registered apprenticeship program” means
an apprenticeship program which is registered with the United
States Department of Labor.
6. “Hair braiding” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 644A.085.
7. “Instructor” means any person who is licensed by the Board
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter to instruct the practice of
barbering in a barber school.
[5.] 8. “Licensed apprentice” means a person who is licensed
to engage in the practice of barbering as an apprentice pursuant to
the provisions of this chapter.
[6.] 9 “Licensed barber” means a person who is licensed to
engage in the practice of barbering pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter.
[7.] 10. “Makeup artistry” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 644A.110.
11. “Practice of barbering” means any of the following
practices for cosmetic purposes:
(a) Shaving or trimming the beard, cutting or trimming the hair,
or hair weaving.
(b) Giving massages of the face or scalp or treatments with oils,
creams, lotions or other preparations, by hand or mechanical
appliances.
(c) Singeing, shampooing or dyeing the hair, or applying hair
tonics.
(d) Applying cosmetic preparations, antiseptics, powders, oils or
lotions to the scalp, face or neck.
(e) Arranging, fitting, cutting, styling, cleaning, coloring or
dyeing a hairpiece or wig, whether made of human hair or synthetic
material. This does not restrict any establishment from setting or
styling a hairpiece or wig in preparation for retail sale.
[8.] 12. “Shampoo technology” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 644A.135.
13. “Student” means a person receiving instruction in a barber
school.
Sec. 4. NRS 643.019 is hereby amended to read as follows:
643.019 This chapter does not apply to:
1. A person licensed pursuant to chapter 644A of NRS, unless
the person has engaged in any act or practice which constitutes a
violation of subsection 6 or 7 of NRS 643.190.
2. Embalmers or undertakers in cutting the hair or trimming the
beard of any deceased person in preparation for burial or cremation.
3. A prisoner who cuts hair in the city or county jail, state
prison, or other detention or correctional facility in which he or she
is incarcerated.
-
*AB225*

– 7 –
4. A person, other than a licensed apprentice, who only cuts
hair under the training and supervision of a licensed barber if,
before commencing the service, the barbershop and the person
who is to cut hair disclose to the customer that the person who is
to cut hair is not licensed under this chapter.
5. A person who engages in the practice of blow-dry styling,
hair braiding or shampoo technology if the person engages in no
other practice which requires a license under this chapter.
6. A person who engages in the practice of makeup artistry.
Sec. 5. NRS 643.070 is hereby amended to read as follows:
643.070 Any person is qualified to receive a license as a
barber:
1. Who is qualified under the provisions of NRS 643.085.
2. Who is at least 18 years of age.
3. [Who is of good moral character and temperate habits.
4.] Who has:
(a) Completed 1,000 hours of training in a school of barbering
approved by the Board;
(b) Practiced as a licensed apprentice for a period of 18 months
under the immediate personal supervision of a licensed barber; [or
(b)] (c) Complied with the requirements of NRS 643.085 [.] ; or
(d) Completed 2,000 hours of training, including 144 hours of
related supplemental instruction, under an agreement with a
sponsoring barbershop in a federally-registered apprenticeship
program for barbering.
[5.] 4. Who has passed an examination conducted by the
Board to determine his or her fitness to practice as a licensed barber.
[6. Who has had a chest X-ray, the results of which indicate he
or she is not tuberculous, and a blood test, the results of which
indicate he or she is not a carrier of communicable diseases.]
Sec. 6. NRS 643.080 is hereby amended to read as follows:
643.080 Any person is qualified to receive a license as an
apprentice:
1. Who is at least 16 1/2 years of age.
2. [Who is of good moral character and temperate habits.
3. Who has graduated from a school of barbering approved by
the Board.
4. Who] Except for a person who is participating in a
federally-registered apprenticeship program, who has passed an
examination conducted by the Board to determine his or her fitness
to practice as a licensed apprentice.
[5. Who has had a chest X-ray, the results of which indicate he
or she is not tuberculous, and a blood test, the results of which
indicate he or she is not a carrier of communicable diseases.]
-
*AB225*

– 8 –
Sec. 7. NRS 643.090 is hereby amended to read as follows:
643.090 1. [Each] Except for an applicant for a license as
an apprentice who is participating in a federally-registered
apprenticeship program, each applicant for a license as a barber or
an apprentice must file an application verified by him or her for an
examination before the Board.
2. The application must be in a form prescribed by the Board.
3. Each application must be accompanied by the fees
prescribed by subsection 4.
4. The Board shall annually fix the examination fees, which
must not be more than $100.
5. [Each applicant must, at the time of filing the application,
file a certificate signed by a licensed physician certifying that the
applicant is free from tuberculosis and other communicable
diseases.
6.] Each applicant must submit all information required to
complete the application.
Sec. 8. NRS 643.120 is hereby amended to read as follows:
643.120 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 643.130, any
person who has a license or certificate [as] :
1. As a barber or an apprentice from another state, the District
of Columbia or a country which has substantially the same
requirements for licensing barbers and apprentices as are required
by the provisions of this chapter ; or
2. For a scope of practice that is substantially the same as the
practice of barbering and has held that license or certificate for
not less than 1 year,
 must be admitted to practice as a licensed barber or apprentice ,
as applicable, pursuant to the regulations adopted by the Board.
Sec. 9. NRS 643.130 is hereby amended to read as follows:
643.130 1. A license as a barber or an apprentice must be
issued by the Board to any applicant who:
(a) [Passes] Except for an applicant applying for a license as
an apprentice who is participating in a federally-registered
apprenticeship program, passes an examination as provided for in
NRS 643.070 and 643.080;
(b) Possesses the other qualifications required by the provisions
of this chapter;
(c) Complies with the requirements set forth in the regulations
of the Board; and
(d) Submits all information required to complete an application
for a license.
2. A person who has a license or certificate as a barber from
another state or the District of Columbia, who has applied for an
examination before the Board and who meets the qualifications set
-
*AB225*

– 9 –
forth in NRS 643.070, except subsection 5 thereof, is temporarily
exempt from licensure and may engage in the practice of barbering
during the period of the temporary exemption if:
(a) The person has submitted a completed application for
licensure for the first time and the application has been approved by
the Board;
(b) The Board has approved the person to sit for the examination
required pursuant to NRS 643.100;
(c) The person has not previously failed an examination for
licensure as a barber;
(d) The person engages in the practice of barbering under the
supervision of a barber licensed pursuant to this chapter and in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the regulations of
the Board; and
(e) The person complies with any other requirements of the
Board to engage in the practice of barbering during the period of the
temporary exemption.
3. The temporary exemption authorized pursuant to subsection
2 begins on the date on which the Board notifies the person that he
or she may engage in the practice of barbering under the temporary
exemption and continues until the date of the examination if the
person does not take the examination or until the date on which the
Board notifies the person of the results of the examination. During
the period of the temporary exemption, the person is subject to the
regulatory and disciplinary authority of the Board to the same extent
as a licensed barber.
Sec. 10. NRS 643.150 is hereby amended to read as follows:
643.150 1. Each licensed barber and licensed apprentice shall
display the license in a conspicuous place adjacent to or near his or
her work chair.
2. A copy of the regulations adopted by the Board must be:
(a) Provided to the owner or manager of each barbershop or
barber school; and
(b) Displayed in a conspicuous place in the barbershop or barber
school.
3. A barbershop shall disclose to a person who is to receive a
service from an apprentice who is participating in an federally-
registered apprenticeship program that the person who is to
provide the service is an apprentice in training. The disclosure
must be in the form of:
(a) Written notice provided to the person who is to receive the
service before the receipt of the service; or
(b) A legible sign at the site where the apprentice is to provide
the service.
-
*AB225*

– 10 –
Sec. 11. NRS 643.171 is hereby amended to read as follows:
643.171 1. No person may operate a barbershop unless the
Board has issued a license to operate a barbershop to that person.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 do not prohibit a person
who holds a license to operate a barbershop from leasing space to
or employing or working in the same space as a person who is
licensed pursuant to chapter 644A of NRS. Such a person who is
licensed pursuant to chapter 644A of NRS remains under the
jurisdiction of the State Board of Cosmetology and remains
subject to the laws and regulations of this State applicable to his or
her business or profession.
3. A licensed barber and a person who is licensed pursuant to
chapter 644A of NRS who work in the same barbershop are not
required to work in different spaces in the barbershop or to have
partitions between them to engage in their respective practices.
Sec. 12. NRS 643.1775 is hereby amended to read as follows:
643.1775 [The]
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, the Board
shall license any person as an instructor who:
[1.] (a) Has applied to the Board in writing on the form
prescribed by the Board;
[2.] (b) Holds a high school diploma or its equivalent;
[3.] (c) Has paid the applicable fees;
[4.] (d) Holds a license as a barber issued by the Board;
[5.] (e) Submits all information required to complete the
application;
[6.] (f) Has practiced not less than 3 years as a full-time
licensed barber in this State, the District of Columbia or in any other
state or country whose requirements for licensing barbers are
substantially equivalent to those in this State;
[7.] (g) Has successfully completed a training program for
instructors conducted by a licensed barber school which consists of
not less than 600 hours of instruction within a 6-month period; and
[8.] (h) Has passed an examination for instructors administered
in accordance with NRS 643.1777.
2. The Board shall license a person as an instructor who:
(a) Holds a license as an instructor of cosmetology issued by
the State Board of Cosmetology pursuant to chapter 644A of NRS;
(b) Has applied to the Board in writing on the form prescribed
by the Board;
(c) Has paid the applicable fees; and
(d) Submits all information required to complete the
application.
-
*AB225*

– 11 –
Sec. 13. Chapter 644A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 14 and 15 of this act.
Sec. 14. “Blow-dry styling” means the practices of
shampooing, conditioning, drying, arranging, curling,
straightening or styling hair using only mechanical devices, hair
sprays and topical agents. The term:
1. Includes the use and styling of hair extensions, hair pieces
and wigs.
2. Does not include cutting, trimming or shaping the hair or
the application of dyes, bleach, reactive chemicals, keratin
treatments or other preparations to color or alter the structure of
hair.
Sec. 15. “Federally-registered apprenticeship program”
means an apprenticeship program which is registered with the
United States Department of Labor.
Sec. 16. NRS 644A.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
644A.010 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 644A.011 to
644A.140, inclusive, and sections 14 and 15 of this act have the
meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 17. NRS 644A.040 is hereby amended to read as follows:
644A.040 “Cosmetology” includes the occupations of a
cosmetologist, esthetician, advanced esthetician, electrologist, hair
designer [, shampoo technologist, hair braider] and nail technologist.
[The term does not include the occupation of a makeup artist.]
Sec. 18. NRS 644A.075 is hereby amended to read as follows:
644A.075 “Esthetics” means the practices of:
1. Beautifying, massaging, cleansing or stimulating the skin of
the human body by the use of cosmetic preparations, antiseptics,
tonics, lotions or creams, or any device for the care of the skin that
is noninvasive and is not an esthetic medical device or otherwise
prohibited by the Board;
2. Applying cosmetics, eyelash extensions or eyelashes to any
person, tinting eyelashes and eyebrows, eyelash perming and
lightening hair on the body;
3. Removing superfluous hair from the body of any person by
the use of depilatories, waxing, tweezers or sugaring; and
4. Performing any of the following procedures for esthetic
purposes and not for the treatment of a medical, physical or mental
ailment:
(a) Extraction;
(b) Hydrotherapy; or
(c) Exfoliation which does not remove any skin below the
stratum corneum, including, without limitation, by the use of
manual exfoliation, microdermabrasion or dermaplaning,
-
*AB225*

– 12 –
 but does not include the branches of cosmetology of a
cosmetologist, advanced esthetician, hair designer, [shampoo
technologist, hair braider,] electrologist or nail technologist.
Sec. 19. NRS 644A.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
644A.110 [1.] “Makeup artistry” means the practice of
applying makeup, strip eyelashes or prosthetics . [for:
(a) Theatrical, television, film and other similar productions;
(b) All aspects of the modeling and fashion industry, including,
without limitation, photography for magazines; and
(c) Weddings.
2. The term includes the practice of applying makeup, strip
eyelashes or prosthetics at:
(a) Licensed cosmetological establishments; and
(b) Retail establishments, unless the practice is limited to the
demonstration of cosmetics by a retailer in the manner described in
paragraph (d) of subsection 1 of NRS 644A.150.]
Sec. 20. NRS 644A.150 is hereby amended to read as follows:
644A.150 1. The following persons are exempt from the
provisions of this chapter:
(a) Except for those provisions relating to advanced estheticians,
all persons authorized by the laws of this State to practice nursing,
medicine, dentistry, osteopathic medicine, chiropractic, naprapathy
or podiatry.
(b) Commissioned medical officers of the Armed Forces of the
United States when engaged in the actual performance of their
official duties, and attendants attached to a unit in a branch of the
Armed Forces of the United States that provides medical services.
(c) Barbers, insofar as their usual and ordinary vocation and
profession is concerned, when engaged in any of the following
practices:
(1) Cleansing or singeing the hair of any person.
(2) Massaging, cleansing, stimulating, exercising or similar
work upon the scalp, face or neck of any person, with the hands or
with mechanical or electrical apparatus or appliances, or by the use
of cosmetic preparations, antiseptics, tonics, lotions or creams.
(d) Retailers, at a retail establishment, insofar as their usual and
ordinary vocation and profession is concerned, when engaged in the
demonstration of cosmetics if:
(1) The demonstration is without charge to the person to
whom the demonstration is given; and
(2) The retailer does not advertise or provide a service
relating to the practice of cosmetology except cosmetics and
fragrances.
(e) [Photographers or their employees, insofar as their usual and
ordinary vocation and profession is concerned, if the photographer
-
*AB225*

– 13 –
or his or her employee does not advertise cosmetological services or
the practice of makeup artistry and provides cosmetics without
charge to the customer.] A person who only cuts hair under the
immediate supervision of a cosmetologist or hair designer if,
before commencing the service, the licensed cosmetological
establishment and the person who is to cut hair disclose to the
customer that the person who is to cut hair is not licensed under
this chapter.
(f) A person who engages in the practice of shampoo
technology, blow-dry styling, hair braiding or makeup artistry if
the person engages in no other practice which requires a license
under this chapter.
2. Any school of cosmetology conducted as part of the
vocational rehabilitation training program of the Department of
Corrections or the Caliente Youth Center:
(a) Is exempt from the requirements of paragraph (c) of
subsection 2 of NRS 644A.740.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of NRS 644A.735, shall
maintain a staff of at least one licensed instructor.
3. Any health care professional, as defined in NRS 453C.030,
is exempt from the provisions of this chapter relating to advanced
estheticians.
Sec. 21. NRS 644A.260 is hereby amended to read as follows:
644A.260 1. The Board shall keep a record containing the
name, known place or places of business, electronic mail address,
personal mailing address, telephone number and the date and
number of the license [or certificate of registration, as applicable,]
of every nail technologist, electrologist, esthetician, advanced
esthetician, hair designer, [shampoo technologist, hair braider,]
person engaged in the practice of threading registered pursuant to
NRS 644A.550 [, makeup artist registered pursuant to NRS
644A.395] and cosmetologist, together with the names and
addresses of all cosmetological establishments and schools of
cosmetology licensed pursuant to this chapter. The record must also
contain the facts which the applicants claimed in their applications
to justify their licensure or registration.
2. The Board may disclose the information contained in the
record kept pursuant to subsection 1 to:
(a) Any other licensing board or agency that is investigating a
licensee or registrant.
(b) A member of the general public, except information
concerning the personal mailing address, work address, electronic
mail address and telephone number of a licensee or registrant.
-
*AB225*

– 14 –
Sec. 22. NRS 644A.300 is hereby amended to read as follows:
644A.300 The Board shall admit to examination for a license
as a cosmetologist any person who has made application to the
Board in proper form and paid the fee, and who before or on the
date of the examination:
1. Is not less than 18 years of age.
2. [Is of good moral character.
3. Has successfully completed the 10th grade in school or its
equivalent. Testing for equivalency must be pursuant to applicable
state or federal requirements.
4.] Has had any one of the following:
(a) Training of at least [1,600] 1,000 hours in a school of
cosmetology approved by the Board.
(b) Practice of the occupation of a cosmetologist for a period of
at least [4 years] 1 year outside this State, including, without
limitation, in any other state, territory or country, which has been
documented and which the Board or its designee deems acceptable.
(c) If the applicant is a barber registered pursuant to chapter 643
of NRS, 600 hours of specialized training approved by the Board.
(d) At least 3,200 hours of service as a cosmetologist’s
apprentice in a licensed cosmetological establishment in which all of
the occupations of cosmetology are practiced [.] other than as a
participant in a federally-registered apprenticeship program for
cosmetology. The required hours must have been completed during
the period of validity of the certificate of registration as a
cosmetologist’s apprentice issued to the person pursuant to
NRS 644A.310.
(e) At least 2,250 hours of training, including at least 180
hours of related supplemental instruction, in a federally-registered
apprenticeship program for cosmetology.
Sec. 23. NRS 644A.310 is hereby amended to read as follows:
644A.310 1. The Board may issue a certificate of registration
as a cosmetologist’s apprentice to a person if:
(a) The person [is required to travel more than 60 miles from his
or her place of residence to attend a licensed school of
cosmetology;] has entered into an agreement with a licensed
cosmetological establishment to serve as a cosmetologist’s
apprentice at the establishment either as part of a federally-
registered apprenticeship program for cosmetology or under
another arrangement; and
(b) The training of the person as a cosmetologist’s apprentice
will be conducted at [a] the licensed cosmetological establishment
[that is located 60 miles or more from a licensed school of
cosmetology.] with which the person entered the agreement.
-
*AB225*

– 15 –
2. The Board may, for good cause shown, waive the
requirements of subsection 1 for a particular applicant.
3. An applicant for a certificate of registration as a
cosmetologist’s apprentice must submit an application to the Board
on a form prescribed by the Board. The application must be
accompanied by a fee of $100 and must include:
(a) A statement signed by the licensed cosmetologist who will
be supervising and training the cosmetologist’s apprentice which
states that the licensed cosmetologist has been licensed by the Board
to practice cosmetology in this State for not less than 3 years
immediately preceding the date of the application and that his or her
license has been in good standing during that period;
(b) A statement signed by the owner of the licensed
cosmetological establishment where the applicant will be trained
which states that the owner will permit the applicant to be trained as
a cosmetologist’s apprentice at the cosmetological establishment;
and
(c) Such other information as the Board may require by
regulation.
4. A certificate of registration as a cosmetologist’s apprentice
is valid for 24 months after the date on which it is issued and may be
renewed by the Board upon good cause shown.
Sec. 24. NRS 644A.315 is hereby amended to read as follows:
644A.315 The Board shall admit to examination for a license
as a hair designer each person who has applied to the Board in
proper form and paid the fee, and who:
1. Is not less than 18 years of age.
2. [Is of good moral character.
3. Has successfully completed the 10th grade in school or its
equivalent. Testing for equivalency must be pursuant to state or
federal requirements.
4.] Satisfies at least one of the following:
(a) Is a barber registered pursuant to chapter 643 of NRS.
(b) Has had training of at least [1,000] 600 hours in a school of
cosmetology approved by the Board.
(c) Has had practice of the occupation of hair designing for at
least [4 years] 1 year outside this State, including, without
limitation, in any other state, territory or country, which has been
documented and which the Board or its designee deems acceptable.
(d) Has had at least 2,000 hours of service as a hair designer’s
apprentice in a licensed cosmetological establishment in which hair
design is practiced [.] , whether as a participant in a federally-
registered apprenticeship program for hair design or another
arrangement. The required hours must have been completed during
the period of validity of the certificate of registration as a hair
-
*AB225*

– 16 –
designer’s apprentice issued to the person pursuant to
NRS 644A.325.
Sec. 25. NRS 644A.325 is hereby amended to read as follows:
644A.325 1. The Board may issue a certificate of registration
as a hair designer’s apprentice to a person if:
(a) The person [is required to travel more than 60 miles from his
or her place of residence to attend a licensed school of
cosmetology;] has entered into an agreement with a licensed
cosmetological establishment to serve as a hair designer’s
apprentice at the establishment either as part of a federally-
registered apprenticeship program for hair design or under
another arrangement; and
(b) The training of the person as a hair designer’s apprentice will
be conducted at [a] the licensed cosmetological establishment [that
is located 60 miles or more from a licensed school of cosmetology.]
with which the person entered the agreement.
2. The Board may, for good cause shown, waive the
requirements of subsection 1 for a particular applicant.
3. An applicant for a certificate of registration as a hair
designer’s apprentice must submit an application to the Board on a
form prescribed by the Board. The application must be accompanied
by a fee of $100 and must include:
(a) A statement signed by the licensed hair designer or licensed
cosmetologist who will be supervising and training the hair
designer’s apprentice which states that the licensed hair designer or
licensed cosmetologist has been licensed by the Board to practice
hair design in this State for not less than 3 years immediately
preceding the date of the application and that his or her license has
been in good standing during that period;
(b) A statement signed by the owner of the licensed
cosmetological establishment where the applicant will be trained
which states that the owner will permit the applicant to be trained as
a hair designer’s apprentice at the cosmetological establishment; and
(c) Such other information as the Board may require by
regulation.
4. A certificate of registration as a hair designer’s apprentice is
valid for 19 months after the date on which it is issued and may be
renewed by the Board upon good cause shown.
Sec. 26. NRS 644A.328 is hereby amended to read as follows:
644A.328 The Board shall admit to examination for a license
as an advanced esthetician any person who has made the application
to the Board in proper form, paid the fee and:
1. Is at least 18 years of age; and
2. [Is of good moral character;
-
*AB225*

– 17 –
3. Has successfully completed the 10th grade in school or its
equivalent; and
4.] Satisfies at least one of the following:
(a) The person has completed at least 900 hours of training in a
licensed school of cosmetology in a curriculum prescribed by the
Board pursuant to NRS 644A.277;
(b) The person is a licensed esthetician and has additionally
completed at least 300 hours of training in a licensed school of
cosmetology in a curriculum prescribed by the Board pursuant to
NRS 644A.277; [or]
(c) The person has practice as an advanced esthetician for at
least [4 years] 1 year outside this State, including, without
limitation, in any other state, territory or country, which has been
documented and which the Board or its designee deems acceptable
[.] ; or
(d) The person has completed 2,000 hours of training,
including 144 hours of related supplemental instruction, as a
participant in a federally-registered apprenticeship program for
advanced esthetics.
Sec. 27. NRS 644A.330 is hereby amended to read as follows:
644A.330 The Board shall admit to examination for a license
as an esthetician any person who has made application to the Board
in proper form, paid the fee and:
1. Is at least 18 years of age; and
2. [Is of good moral character;
3. Has successfully completed the 10th grade in school or its
equivalent; and
4.] Has had any one of the following:
(a) A minimum of 600 hours of training, which includes theory
and practice, in a licensed school of cosmetology.
(b) Practice as an esthetician for at least [4 years] 1 year outside
this State, including, without limitation, in another state, territory or
country, which has been documented and which the Board or its
designee deems acceptable.
(c) At least 1,200 hours of service as an esthetician’s apprentice
in a licensed cosmetological establishment in which esthetics is
practiced [.] other than as a participant in a federally-registered
apprentice program for esthetics. The required hours must have
been completed during the period of validity of the certificate of
registration as an esthetician’s apprentice issued to the person
pursuant to NRS 644A.340.
(d) Completed 2,000 hours of training, including 144 hours of
related supplemental instruction, as a participant in a federally-
registered apprenticeship program for esthetics.
-
*AB225*

– 18 –
Sec. 28. NRS 644A.340 is hereby amended to read as follows:
644A.340 1. The Board may issue a certificate of registration
as an esthetician’s apprentice to a person if:
(a) The person [is required to travel more than 60 miles from his
or her place of residence to attend a licensed school of
cosmetology;] has entered into an agreement with a licensed
cosmetological establishment to serve as an esthetician’s
apprentice at the establishment either as part of a federally-
registered apprenticeship program for esthetics or under another
arrangement; and
(b) The training of the person as an esthetician’s apprentice will
be conducted at [a] the licensed cosmetological establishment [that
is located 60 miles or more from a licensed school of cosmetology.]
with which the person entered the agreement.
2. The Board may, for good cause shown, waive the
requirements of subsection 1 for a particular applicant.
3. An applicant for a certificate of registration as an
esthetician’s apprentice must submit an application to the Board on
a form prescribed by the Board. The application must be
accompanied by a fee of $100 and must include:
(a) A statement signed by the licensed esthetician or licensed
cosmetologist who will be supervising and training the esthetician’s
apprentice which states that the licensed esthetician or licensed
cosmetologist has been licensed by the Board to practice esthetics in
this State for not less than 3 years immediately preceding the date of
the application and that his or her license has been in good standing
during that period;
(b) A statement signed by the owner of the licensed
cosmetological establishment where the applicant will be trained
which states that the owner will permit the applicant to be trained as
an esthetician’s apprentice at the cosmetological establishment; and
(c) Such other information as the Board may require by
regulation.
4. A certificate of registration as an esthetician’s apprentice is
valid for 12 months after the date on which it is issued and may be
renewed by the Board upon good cause shown.
Sec. 29. NRS 644A.345 is hereby amended to read as follows:
644A.345 The Board shall admit to examination for a license
as a nail technologist any person who has made application to the
Board in proper form, paid the fee and who, before or on the date of
the examination:
1. Is not less than 18 years of age.
2. [Is of good moral character.
3. Has successfully completed the 10th grade in school or its
equivalent.
-
*AB225*

– 19 –
4.] Has had any one of the following:
(a) Practical training of at least 600 hours under the immediate
supervision of a licensed instructor in a licensed school of
cosmetology in which the practice is taught.
(b) Practice as a nail technologist for at least [4 years] 1 year
outside this State, including, without limitation, in another state,
territory or country, which has been documented and which the
Board or its designee deems acceptable.
(c) At least 1,200 hours of service as a nail technologist’s
apprentice in a licensed cosmetological establishment in which nail
technology is practiced [.] other than as a participant in a
federally-registered apprenticeship program for nail technology.
The required hours must have been completed during the period of
validity of the certificate of registration as a nail technologist’s
apprentice issued to the person pursuant to NRS 644A.355.
(d) At least 2,000 hours of training, including 144 hours of
related supplemental instruction, in a federally-registered
apprenticeship program for nail technology.
Sec. 30. NRS 644A.355 is hereby amended to read as follows:
644A.355 1. The Board may issue a certificate of registration
as a nail technologist’s apprentice to a person if:
(a) The person [is required to travel more than 60 miles from his
or her place of residence to attend a licensed school of
cosmetology;] has entered into an agreement with a licensed
cosmetological establishment to serve as a nail technologist’s
apprentice at the establishment either as part of a federally-
registered apprenticeship program or under another arrangement;
and
(b) The training of the person as a nail technologist’s apprentice
will be conducted at [a] the licensed cosmetological establishment
[that is located 60 miles or more from a licensed school of
cosmetology.] with which the person entered the agreement.
2. The Board may, for good cause shown, waive the
requirements of subsection 1 for a particular applicant.
3. An applicant for a certificate of registration as a nail
technologist’s apprentice must submit an application to the Board on
a form prescribed by the Board. The application must be
accompanied by a fee of $100 and must include:
(a) A statement signed by the licensed nail technologist or
licensed cosmetologist who will be supervising and training the nail
technologist’s apprentice which states that the licensed nail
technologist or licensed cosmetologist has been licensed by the
Board to practice nail technology in this State for not less than 3
years immediately preceding the date of the application and that his
or her license has been in good standing during that period;
-
*AB225*

– 20 –
(b) A statement signed by the owner of the licensed
cosmetological establishment where the applicant will be trained
which states that the owner will permit the applicant to be trained as
a nail technologist’s apprentice at the cosmetological establishment;
and
(c) Such other information as the Board may require by
regulation.
4. A certificate of registration as a nail technologist’s
apprentice is valid for 10 months after the date on which it is issued
and may be renewed by the Board upon good cause shown.
Sec. 31. NRS 644A.400 is hereby amended to read as follows:
644A.400 The Board shall admit to examination for a license
as an electrologist any person who has made application to the
Board in the proper form and paid the fee, and who before or on the
date set for the examination:
1. Is not less than 18 years of age.
2. [Is of good moral character.
3. Has successfully completed the 12th grade in school or its
equivalent.
4.] Has or has completed any one of the following:
(a) A minimum training of 500 hours under the immediate
supervision of an approved electrologist in an approved school in
which the practice is taught.
(b) Study of the practice for at least 1,000 hours [extending over
a period of 8 consecutive months,] under an electrologist licensed
pursuant to this chapter, in an approved program for electrologist’s
apprentices [.] other than a federally-registered apprenticeship
program for electrology.
(c) A valid electrologist’s license issued by [a] another state
[whose licensing requirements are equal to or greater than those of]
or territory of the United States or the District of Columbia for the
same scope of practice as a license as an electrologist issued by
this State.
(d) Either training or practice, or a combination of training and
practice, in electrology outside this State for a period specified by
regulations of the Board.
(e) At least 2,000 hours of training, including 144 hours of
related supplemental instruction, under an approved
apprenticeship agreement in a federally-registered apprenticeship
program for electrology.
Sec. 32. NRS 644A.450 is hereby amended to read as follows:
644A.450 1. An application for admission to examination or
for a license in any branch of cosmetology, or for a certificate of
registration as [a shampoo technologist,] an esthetician’s apprentice,
cosmetologist’s apprentice, hair designer’s apprentice or nail
-
*AB225*

– 21 –
technologist’s apprentice must be made in writing on forms
furnished by the Board and must be submitted within the period
designated by the Board. The Board shall charge a nonrefundable
fee of $15 for furnishing the forms.
2. An application must contain proof of the qualifications of
the applicant for examination, licensure or registration. The
applicant must certify that all the information contained in the
application is truthful and accurate.
Sec. 33. NRS 644A.460 is hereby amended to read as follows:
644A.460 Upon application to the Board, accompanied by a
fee of $200, a person currently licensed in any branch of
cosmetology under the laws of another state or territory of the
United States or the District of Columbia may, without examination,
unless the Board sees fit to require an examination, be granted a
license to practice the occupation in which the applicant was
previously licensed upon proof satisfactory to the Board that the
applicant:
1. Is not less than 18 years of age.
2. [Is of good moral character.
3.] Is currently licensed in another state or territory or the
District of Columbia.
Sec. 34. NRS 644A.470 is hereby amended to read as follows:
644A.470 1. In addition to the fee for an application, the fees
for examination are:
(a) For examination as a cosmetologist, not less than $75 and
not more than $200.
(b) For examination as an electrologist, not less than $75 and not
more than $200.
(c) For examination as a hair designer, not less than $75 and not
more than $200.
(d) [For examination as a shampoo technologist, not less than
$50 and not more than $100.
(e) For examination as a hair braider, not less than $75 and not
more than $200.
(f)] For examination as a nail technologist, not less than $75 and
not more than $200.
[(g)] (e) For examination as an esthetician, not less than $75
and not more than $200.
[(h)] (f) For examination as an advanced esthetician, not less
than $75 and not more than $200.
[(i)] (g) For examination as an instructor of estheticians,
advanced estheticians, hair designers, cosmetology or nail
technology, not less than $75 and not more than $200.
2. The fee for each reexamination is not less than $75 and not
more than $200.
-
*AB225*

– 22 –
3. Each applicant referred to in subsection 1 shall, in addition
to the fees specified therein, pay the reasonable value of all supplies
necessary to be used in the examination.
Sec. 35. NRS 644A.480 is hereby amended to read as follows:
644A.480 1. The Board:
(a) Shall provide examinations for licensure [or registration] as a
cosmetologist, esthetician, advanced esthetician, hair designer [,
shampoo technologist, hair braider] or nail technologist in English
and, upon the request of an applicant for licensure [or registration]
as a cosmetologist, esthetician, advanced esthetician, hair designer [,
shampoo technologist, hair braider] or nail technologist, in Spanish;
and
(b) May provide examinations for licensure [or registration] as a
cosmetologist, esthetician, advanced esthetician, hair designer [,
shampoo technologist, hair braider] or nail technologist, in any other
language upon the request of an applicant, if the Board determines
that providing the examination in that language is in the best
interests of the public.
2. A request for an examination for licensure [or registration]
as a cosmetologist, esthetician, advanced esthetician, hair designer [,
shampoo technologist, hair braider] or nail technologist to be
translated into a language other than English or Spanish must be
filed with the Board by the applicant making the request at least 90
days before the scheduled examination. The Board shall keep all
such requests on file.
3. The Board shall impose a fee upon the applicants who file
requests for an examination for licensure [or registration] as a
cosmetologist, esthetician, advanced esthetician, hair designer [,
shampoo technologist, hair braider] or nail technologist to be
translated into a language other than English or Spanish. The fee
must be sufficient to ensure that the applicants bear the full cost for
the development, preparation, administration, grading and
evaluation of the translated examination. The fee is in addition to all
other fees that must be paid by applicants for the examination for
licensure [or registration] as a cosmetologist, esthetician, advanced
esthetician, hair designer [, shampoo technologist, hair braider] or
nail technologist.
4. In determining whether it is in the best interests of the public
to translate an examination for licensure [or registration] as a
cosmetologist, esthetician, advanced esthetician, hair designer [,
shampoo technologist, hair braider] or nail technologist into a
language other than English or Spanish, the Board shall consider the
percentage of the population within this State whose native language
is the language for which the translated examination is sought.
-
*AB225*

– 23 –
Sec. 36. NRS 644A.490 is hereby amended to read as follows:
644A.490 1. The Board shall issue a license [or certificate of
registration, as applicable,] as a cosmetologist, esthetician, advanced
esthetician, electrologist, hair designer, [shampoo technologist, hair
braider,] nail technologist or instructor to each applicant who:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 644A.455, passes a
satisfactory examination, conducted by the Board to determine his
or her fitness to practice that occupation of cosmetology;
(b) Complies with such other requirements as are prescribed in
this chapter for the issuance of the license or certificate of
registration; and
(c) Has paid any required fees, fines or outstanding balances as
required by the Board.
2. The fees for issuance of an initial license [or certificate of
registration, as applicable,] are:
(a) For nail technologists, electrologists, estheticians, advanced
estheticians, hair designers [, hair braiders, shampoo technologists]
and cosmetologists:
(1) For 2 years, not less than $50 and not more than $100.
(2) For 4 years, not less than $100 and not more than $200.
(b) For instructors:
(1) For 2 years, not less than $60 and not more than $100.
(2) For 4 years, not less than $120 and not more than $200.
Sec. 37. NRS 644A.510 is hereby amended to read as follows:
644A.510 Every licensed [or registered] nail technologist,
electrologist, esthetician, advanced esthetician, hair designer [,
shampoo technologist, hair braider] or cosmetologist shall, within
30 days after changing his or her place of business or personal
mailing address, as designated in the records of the Board, notify the
Board of the new place of business or personal mailing address.
Upon receipt of the notification, the Board shall make the necessary
change in the records.
Sec. 38. NRS 644A.515 is hereby amended to read as follows:
644A.515 1. The license [or certificate of registration, as
applicable,] of every cosmetologist, esthetician, advanced
esthetician, electrologist, hair designer, [shampoo technologist, hair
braider,] nail technologist and instructor expires on either:
(a) The second anniversary of the birthday of the licensee [or
holder of the certificate of registration] measured, in the case of an
original license , [or certificate of registration,] restored license , [or
certificate of registration,] renewal of a license [or certificate of
registration] or renewal of an expired license , [or certificate of
registration,] from the birthday of the licensee or holder nearest the
date of issuance, restoration or renewal; or
-
*AB225*

– 24 –
(b) The fourth anniversary of the birthday of the licensee [or
holder of the certificate of registration] measured, in the case of an
original license , [or certificate of registration,] restored license , [or
certificate of registration,] renewal of a license , [or certificate of
registration] or renewal of an expired license [or certificate of
registration] from the birthday of the licensee [or holder] nearest the
date of issuance, restoration or renewal.
2. The Board may, by regulation, defer the expiration of a
license [or certificate of registration, as applicable,] of a person who
is on active duty in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United
States upon such terms and conditions as it may prescribe. The
Board may similarly defer the expiration of the license [or
certificate of registration, as applicable,] of the spouse or dependent
child of that person if the spouse or child is residing with the person.
3. The Board may, by regulation, defer the expiration of a
license [or certificate of registration, as applicable,] of a person
who:
(a) Submits to the Board, on a form prescribed by the Board, a
request for his or her license [or certificate of registration] to be
placed on inactive or retirement status; and
(b) Pays a fee in an amount established by the Board by
regulation.
4. For the purposes of this section, any licensee [or holder of a
certificate of registration] whose date of birth occurs on February 29
in a leap year shall be deemed to have a birthdate of February 28.
5. The Board shall send written notice to a licensee [or holder
of a certificate of registration] identifying the date of the expiration
of his or her license or certificate of registration, as applicable, at
least:
(a) Ninety days before the license [or certificate of registration]
expires; and
(b) Once each month following the month in which notice is
sent pursuant to paragraph (a) until the month in which the license
[or certificate of registration] expires.
Sec. 39. NRS 644A.520 is hereby amended to read as follows:
644A.520 1. An application for renewal of any license [or
certificate of registration] issued pursuant to this chapter must be:
(a) Made on a form prescribed and furnished by the Board;
(b) Made on or before the date for renewal specified by the
Board;
(c) Accompanied by the applicable fee for renewal; and
(d) Accompanied by all information required to complete the
renewal.
2. The fees for renewal of a license [or a certificate of
registration, as applicable,] are:
-
*AB225*

– 25 –
(a) For nail technologists, electrologists, estheticians, advanced
estheticians, hair designers [, hair braiders, shampoo technologists]
and cosmetologists:
(1) For 2 years, not less than $50 and not more than $100.
(2) For 4 years, not less than $100 and not more than $200.
(b) For instructors:
(1) For 2 years, not less than $60 and not more than $100.
(2) For 4 years, not less than $120 and not more than $200.
(c) For cosmetological establishments:
(1) For 2 years, not less than $100 and not more than $200.
(2) For 4 years, not less than $200 and not more than $400.
(d) For schools of cosmetology:
(1) For 2 years, not less than $500 and not more than $800.
(2) For 4 years, not less than $1,000 and not more than
$1,600.
3. [For each month or fraction thereof after the date for renewal
specified by the Board in which a license or a certificate of
registration as a shampoo technologist is not renewed, there must be
assessed and collected at the time of renewal a penalty of $50 for a
school of cosmetology and $20 for a cosmetological establishment,
all persons licensed pursuant to this chapter and persons registered
as a shampoo technologist.
4.] An application for the renewal of a license [or a certificate
of registration, as applicable,] as a cosmetologist, hair designer,
[shampoo technologist, hair braider,] esthetician, advanced
esthetician, electrologist, nail technologist or instructor must be:
(a) Accompanied by a current photograph of the applicant; or
(b) If the application for the renewal of the license [or certificate
of registration, as applicable,] is made online, accompanied by a
current photograph of the applicant which is electronically attached
to the application for renewal.
[5.] 4. Before a person applies for the renewal of a license [or
certificate of registration, as applicable,] as a cosmetologist, hair
designer, [shampoo technologist, hair braider,] esthetician, advanced
esthetician, electrologist or nail technologist, the person must:
(a) Complete at least 4 hours of instruction relating to infection
control and prevention in a professional course or seminar approved
by the Board; and
(b) Pay any outstanding fee, fine or other balance owed to the
Board.
Sec. 40. NRS 644A.525 is hereby amended to read as follows:
644A.525 1. A nail technologist, electrologist, esthetician,
advanced esthetician, hair designer, [shampoo technologist, hair
braider,] cosmetologist or instructor whose license [or certificate of
registration, as applicable,] has expired may have his or her license
-
*AB225*

– 26 –
[or certificate of registration] renewed only upon payment of all
applicable required fees and submission of all information required
to complete the renewal.
2. Any nail technologist, electrologist, esthetician, advanced
esthetician, hair designer, [shampoo technologist, hair braider,]
cosmetologist or instructor who retires from practice for more than 1
year may have his or her license [or certificate of registration, as
applicable,] restored only upon payment of all required fees and
submission of all information required to complete the restoration.
3. No nail technologist, electrologist, esthetician, advanced
esthetician, hair designer, [shampoo technologist, hair braider,]
cosmetologist or instructor who has retired from practice for more
than 4 years may have his or her license [or certificate of
registration, as applicable,] restored without examination and must
comply with any additional requirements established in regulations
adopted by the Board.
Sec. 41. NRS 644A.535 is hereby amended to read as follows:
644A.535 1. A holder of a certificate of registration as a
cosmetologist’s apprentice or apprentice of a single branch of
cosmetology shall display the certificate of registration issued to
him or her by the Board or a duplicate of the certificate of
registration in plain view of the public at the position where the
apprentice is being trained.
2. If the apprentice is:
(a) A cosmetologist’s apprentice, the cosmetologist’s apprentice,
the licensed cosmetologist supervising and training the
cosmetologist’s apprentice, and the owner of the cosmetological
establishment where the cosmetologist’s apprentice is being trained
shall not advertise or hold the cosmetologist’s apprentice out as
being a licensed cosmetologist, or use any title or abbreviation that
would indicate that the cosmetologist’s apprentice is a licensed
cosmetologist.
(b) An apprentice of a single branch of cosmetology, the
licensed cosmetologist, esthetician, electrologist, hair designer or
nail technologist supervising and training the apprentice, and the
owner of the cosmetological establishment where the apprentice is
being trained shall not advertise or hold the apprentice out as being
a licensed cosmetologist, esthetician, electrologist, hair designer or
nail technologist or use any title or abbreviation that would indicate
that the apprentice is a licensed cosmetologist, esthetician,
electrologist, hair designer or nail technologist.
3. To receive credit for an apprenticeship:
(a) A cosmetologist’s apprentice must be regularly employed
during his or her training by:
-
*AB225*

– 27 –
(1) The cosmetological establishment where the
cosmetologist’s apprentice is being trained; or
(2) If the cosmetologist’s apprentice is being supervised and
trained by a licensed cosmetologist who is leasing space in a
cosmetological establishment, the licensed cosmetologist.
(b) An apprentice of a single branch of cosmetology must be
regularly employed during his or her training by:
(1) The cosmetological establishment where the apprentice is
being trained; or
(2) If the apprentice is being supervised and trained by a
licensed cosmetologist, esthetician, electrologist, hair designer or
nail technologist who is leasing space in a cosmetological
establishment, the licensed cosmetologist, esthetician, electrologist,
hair designer or nail technologist.
4. Not more than one cosmetologist’s apprentice or apprentice
of a single branch of cosmetology may be employed at any time at a
licensed cosmetological establishment.
5. A licensed:
(a) Cosmetologist who is supervising and training a
cosmetologist’s apprentice shall:
(1) Supervise all work done by the cosmetologist’s
apprentice; and
(2) Be in attendance at all times that the cosmetologist’s
apprentice is engaged in the practice of cosmetology.
(b) Cosmetologist, esthetician, electrologist, hair designer or nail
technologist who is supervising and training an apprentice of a
single branch of cosmetology shall:
(1) Supervise all work done by the apprentice; and
(2) Be in attendance at all times that the apprentice is
engaged in the practice of the branch of cosmetology for which the
apprentice holds a certificate of registration.
6. [A] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, a
licensed:
(a) Cosmetologist who is supervising and training a
cosmetologist’s apprentice shall keep a daily record of the training
that is provided to the cosmetologist’s apprentice. The licensed
cosmetologist shall:
(1) Keep the daily records at the cosmetological
establishment where the cosmetologist’s apprentice is being trained
and, upon the request of the Board, make the daily records available
to the Board; and
(2) Submit a copy of the records to the Board at such regular
intervals as the Board may require by regulation.
(b) Cosmetologist, esthetician, electrologist, hair designer or nail
technologist who is supervising and training an apprentice of a
-
*AB225*

– 28 –
single branch of cosmetology shall keep a daily record of the
training that is provided to the apprentice. The licensed
cosmetologist, esthetician, electrologist, hair designer or nail
technologist shall:
(1) Keep the daily records at the cosmetological
establishment where the apprentice is being trained and, upon the
request of the Board, make the daily records available to the Board;
and
(2) Submit a copy of the records to the Board at such regular
intervals as the Board may require by regulation.
7. The provisions of subsection 6 do not apply to the
apprenticeship of a person who is participating in a federally-
registered apprenticeship program to the extent that the provisions
of subsection 6 conflict with the standards established for the
federally-registered apprenticeship program.
8. A cosmetological establishment shall disclose to a person
who is to receive a service from an apprentice who is participating
in a federally-registered apprenticeship program that the person
who is to provide the service is an apprentice in training. The
disclosure must be in the form of:
(a) Written notice provided to the person who is to receive the
service before the receipt of the service; or
(b) A legible sign at the site where the apprentice is to provide
the service.
9. A licensed cosmetologist, licensed hair designer, licensed
esthetician, licensed electrologist or licensed nail technologist who
supervises and trains an apprentice who participates in a
federally-registered apprenticeship program shall train the
apprentice in all branches of practical work and related
supplemental instruction for the scope of the license for which the
apprentice is in training.
10. For the purposes of this chapter:
(a) A licensed cosmetologist is not required to obtain a license
from the Board as an instructor to train a cosmetologist’s apprentice
pursuant to this section and NRS 644A.310, and the licensed
cosmetologist is not subject to regulation as an instructor because he
or she provides such training.
(b) A licensed cosmetologist, esthetician, electrologist, hair
designer or nail technologist is not required to obtain a license from
the Board as an instructor to train an apprentice of a single branch of
cosmetology pursuant to this section and NRS 644A.325, 644A.340,
644A.355 or 644A.410 and the licensed cosmetologist, esthetician,
electrologist, hair designer or nail technologist is not subject to
regulation as an instructor because he or she provides such training.
-
*AB225*

– 29 –
(c) A licensed cosmetological establishment which employs a
cosmetologist’s apprentice or apprentice of a single branch of
cosmetology or at which a cosmetologist’s apprentice or apprentice
of a single branch of cosmetology is being trained is not subject to
regulation as a school of cosmetology because the cosmetologist’s
apprentice or apprentice of a single branch of cosmetology is being
trained at the cosmetological establishment.
[8. The]
11. To the extent that they do not otherwise conflict with
provisions governing apprenticeships in federally-registered
apprentice programs, the Board may adopt:
(a) Regulations relating to the qualifications of a licensed:
(1) Cosmetologist to supervise and train a cosmetologist’s
apprentice; and
(2) Cosmetologist, esthetician, electrologist, hair designer or
nail technologist to supervise and train an apprentice of a single
branch of cosmetology;
(b) Regulations relating to the procedures and subject matter
that must be included in the training of a cosmetologist’s apprentice
or an apprentice of a single branch of cosmetology;
(c) Regulations relating to the training of a cosmetologist’s
apprentice or apprentice of a single branch of cosmetology to verify
the number of hours of training received by the cosmetologist’s
apprentice or apprentice of a single branch of cosmetology; and
(d) Such other regulations as the Board determines necessary to
carry out the provisions of this section and NRS 644A.310,
644A.325, 644A.340, 644A.355 and 644A.410.
[9.] 12. As used in this section, “apprentice of a single branch
of cosmetology” means a person engaged in learning the occupation
of esthetician, electrologist, hair designer or nail technologist.
Sec. 42. NRS 644A.615 is hereby amended to read as follows:
644A.615 1. Every holder of a license issued by the Board to
operate a cosmetological establishment shall display in plain view of
members of the general public:
(a) In the principal office or place of business of the holder, the
license or a duplicate of the license; and
(b) At each cosmetological establishment operated by the
holder, a sign of sufficient size to be legible to members of the
general public stating that the establishment is not a medical facility.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the operator of
a cosmetological establishment may lease space to or employ only
licensed or registered, as applicable, nail technologists,
electrologists, estheticians, advanced estheticians, hair designers [,
shampoo technologists, hair braiders] and cosmetologists at the
establishment to provide services relating to the practice of
-
*AB225*

– 30 –
cosmetology. This subsection does not prohibit an operator of a
cosmetological establishment from:
(a) Leasing space to [or] a barber, employing a barber [.] or
working in the same space as a barber. Such a barber remains
under the jurisdiction of the State Barbers’ Health and Sanitation
Board and remains subject to the laws and regulations of this State
applicable to his or her business or profession.
(b) Leasing space to any other professional, including, without
limitation, a provider of health care pursuant to subsection 3. Each
such professional remains under the jurisdiction of the regulatory
body which governs his or her business or profession and remains
subject to the laws and regulations of this State applicable to such
business or profession.
3. The operator of a cosmetological establishment may lease
space at the cosmetological establishment to a provider of health
care for the purpose of providing health care within the scope of his
or her practice. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, the
provider of health care shall not use the leased space to provide such
health care at the same time a cosmetologist uses that space to
engage in the practice of cosmetology. A provider of health care
who leases space at a cosmetological establishment pursuant to this
subsection remains under the jurisdiction of the regulatory body
which governs his or her business or profession and remains subject
to the laws and regulations of this State applicable to such business
or profession.
4. A provider of health care who is a health care professional
may use leased space at a cosmetological establishment to provide
health care associated with the supervision of an advanced
esthetician pursuant to NRS 644A.545 at the same time as a
cosmetologist uses that space to engage in the practice of
cosmetology.
5. A person who is licensed pursuant to this chapter and a
person licensed as a barber pursuant to chapter 643 of NRS who
work in the same cosmetological establishment are not required to
use different spaces in the cosmetological establishment or to have
partitions between them to engage in their respective practices.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Health care professional” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 453C.030.
(b) “Provider of health care” means a person who is licensed,
certified or otherwise authorized by the law of this State to
administer health care in the ordinary course of business or practice
of a profession.
(c) “Space” includes, without limitation, a separate room in the
cosmetological establishment.
-
*AB225*

– 31 –
Sec. 43. NRS 644A.620 is hereby amended to read as follows:
644A.620 Cosmetology and threading may be practiced in a
cosmetological establishment by licensed or registered, as
applicable, cosmetologists, estheticians, advanced estheticians,
electrologists, hair designers, [shampoo technologists, hair braiders,]
nail technologists and natural persons who engage in the practice of
threading, as appropriate, who are:
1. Employees of the owner of the enterprise; or
2. Lessees of space from the owner of the enterprise.
Sec. 44. NRS 644A.625 is hereby amended to read as follows:
644A.625 1. A cosmetological establishment must, at all
times, be under the immediate supervision of a person who is
licensed in the branch of cosmetology or a combination of branches
of cosmetology of any service relating to the practice of
cosmetology provided at the cosmetological establishment at the
time the service is provided.
2. If the operator of a cosmetological establishment leases
space to a licensed or registered, as applicable, nail technologist,
electrologist, esthetician, advanced esthetician, hair designer [,
shampoo technologist, hair braider] or cosmetologist pursuant to
NRS 644A.615, the lessee must provide supervision for that branch
of cosmetology in the manner required by subsection 1.
3. If a cosmetological establishment is open to the public at any
time during which no licensed or registered, as applicable, nail
technologist, electrologist, esthetician, advanced esthetician, hair
designer [, shampoo technologist, hair braider] or cosmetologist is
physically present in the establishment, the cosmetological
establishment must display conspicuously a sign indicating that no
cosmetological services are being offered at that time.
Sec. 45. NRS 644A.850 is hereby amended to read as follows:
644A.850 1. The following are grounds for disciplinary
action by the Board:
(a) Failure of an owner of a cosmetological establishment, a
licensed or registered, as applicable, esthetician, advanced
esthetician, cosmetologist, hair designer, [shampoo technologist,
hair braider,] electrologist, instructor, nail technologist [, makeup
artist] or school of cosmetology to comply with the requirements of
this chapter or the applicable regulations adopted by the Board.
(b) Failure of a cosmetologist’s apprentice, electrologist’s
apprentice, esthetician’s apprentice, hair designer’s apprentice or
nail technologist’s apprentice to comply with the requirements of
this chapter or the applicable regulations adopted by the Board.
(c) Obtaining practice in cosmetology or any branch thereof, for
money or any thing of value, by fraudulent misrepresentation.
(d) Gross malpractice.
-
*AB225*

– 32 –
(e) Continued practice by a person knowingly having an
infectious or contagious disease.
(f) Drunkenness or the use or possession, or both, of a controlled
substance or dangerous drug without a prescription, while engaged
in the practice of cosmetology.
(g) Advertising in violation of any of the provisions of NRS
644A.800 or 644A.935.
(h) Permitting a license or certificate of registration to be used
where the holder thereof is not personally, actively and continuously
engaged in business.
(i) Failure to display the license or certificate of registration or a
duplicate of the license or certificate of registration as provided in
NRS 644A.530, 644A.535, 644A.615 and 644A.710.
(j) Failure to display the sign as provided in paragraph (b) of
subsection 1 of NRS 644A.615.
(k) Entering, by a school of cosmetology, into an
unconscionable contract with a student of cosmetology.
(l) Continued practice of cosmetology or operation of a
cosmetological establishment or school of cosmetology after the
license therefor has expired.
(m) Engaging in prostitution or solicitation for prostitution in
violation of NRS 201.353 or 201.354 by the owner of a
cosmetological establishment or a facility in which threading is
conducted, a licensee or a holder of a certificate of registration.
(n) Failure to comply with the provisions of NRS 454.217 or
629.086.
(o) Any other unfair or unjust practice, method or dealing
which, in the judgment of the Board, may justify such action.
2. If the Board determines that a violation of this section has
occurred, it may:
(a) Refuse to issue or renew a license or certificate of
registration;
(b) Revoke or suspend a license or certificate of registration;
(c) Place the licensee or holder of a certificate of registration on
probation for a specified period;
(d) Impose a fine not to exceed $2,000; or
(e) Take any combination of the actions authorized by
paragraphs (a) to (d), inclusive.
3. An order that imposes discipline and the findings of fact and
conclusions of law supporting that order are public records.
Sec. 46. NRS 644A.900 is hereby amended to read as follows:
644A.900 1. It is unlawful for any person to conduct or
operate a cosmetological establishment, a school of cosmetology or
any other place of business in which any one or any combination of
-
*AB225*

– 33 –
the occupations of cosmetology are taught or practiced unless the
person is licensed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 4 and 5, it is
unlawful for any person to engage in, or attempt to engage in, the
practice of cosmetology or any branch thereof, whether for
compensation or otherwise, unless the person is licensed or
registered in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.
3. This chapter does not prohibit:
(a) Any student in any school of cosmetology established
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter from engaging, in the
school and as a student, in work connected with any branch or any
combination of branches of cosmetology in the school.
(b) An electrologist’s apprentice from participating in a course
of practical training and study.
(c) A person issued a provisional license as an instructor
pursuant to NRS 644A.415 from acting as an instructor and
accepting compensation therefor while accumulating the hours of
training as a teacher required for an instructor’s license.
(d) The rendering of services relating to the practice of
cosmetology by a person who is licensed or registered in accordance
with the provisions of this chapter, if those services are rendered in
connection with photographic services provided by a photographer.
(e) A registered cosmetologist’s apprentice from engaging in the
practice of cosmetology under the immediate supervision of a
licensed cosmetologist who is approved to supervise the apprentice.
(f) [A registered shampoo technologist from engaging in the
practice of shampoo technology under the immediate supervision of
a licensed cosmetologist or hair designer.
(g)] A registered esthetician’s apprentice from engaging in the
practice of esthetics under the immediate supervision of a licensed
esthetician or licensed cosmetologist who is approved to supervise
the apprentice.
[(h)] (g) A registered hair designer’s apprentice from engaging
in the practice of hair design under the immediate supervision of a
licensed hair designer or licensed cosmetologist who is approved to
supervise the apprentice.
[(i)] (h) A registered nail technologist’s apprentice from
engaging in the practice of nail technology under the immediate
supervision of a licensed nail technologist or licensed cosmetologist
who is approved to supervise the apprentice.
[(j)] (i) A [makeup artist registered pursuant to NRS 644A.395]
person from engaging in the practice of makeup artistry for
compensation or otherwise in a licensed cosmetological
establishment.
-
*AB225*

– 34 –
(j) A person who participates in a federally-registered
apprenticeship program pursuant to this chapter from engaging in
the practice for which the apprenticeship is offered in
collaboration with the provider of the apprenticeship.
4. A person employed to render services relating to the practice
of cosmetology in the course of and incidental to the production of a
motion picture, television program, commercial or advertisement is
exempt from the licensing or registration requirements of this
chapter if he or she renders those services only to persons who will
appear in that motion picture, television program, commercial or
advertisement.
[5. A person practicing hair braiding is exempt from the
licensing requirements of this chapter applicable to hair braiding if
the hair braiding is practiced on a person who is related within the
sixth degree of consanguinity and the person does not accept
compensation for the hair braiding.]
Sec. 47. NRS 644A.080, 644A.105, 644A.130, 644A.360,
644A.370, 644A.375, 644A.380 and 644A.395 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 48. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 47, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act.
(b) On October 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
LEADLINES OF REPEALED SECTIONS
644A.080 “Hair braider” defined.
644A.105 “Makeup artist” defined.
644A.130 “Shampoo technologist” defined.
644A.360 General qualifications for examination.
644A.370 Scope of examination.
644A.375 Qualifications for examination; fee.
644A.380 Scope of examination.
644A.395 Certificate of registration required to practice in
licensed cosmetological establishment; qualifications; fee;
qualifications of makeup artist not required to be registered;
expiration.
H
-
*AB225*